Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB325.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 405.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The father and mother shall have the joint custody, nurture, and education of their
children who are under the age of eighteen (18). If either of the parents dies, the
survivor, if suited to the trust, shall have the custody, nurture, and education of the
children who are under the age of eighteen (18). The father and mother shall be
primarily liable for the nurture and education of his or her children who are under
the age of eighteen (18) and for any unmarried child over the age of eighteen (18)
when the child is a full-time high school student, but not beyond completion of the
school year during which the child reaches the age of nineteen (19) years.
(2) The father and mother shall have the joint custody, care, and support of their
children who have reached the age of eighteen (18) and who are wholly dependent
because of permanent physical or mental disability. If either of the parents dies, the
survivor, if suited to the trust, shall have the custody, care, and support of such
children.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a person
claiming to be a de facto custodian, as defined in KRS 403.270, may petition a
court for legal custody of a child. The court shall grant legal custody to the person if
the court determines that the person meets the definition of de facto custodian and
that the best interests of the child will be served by awarding custody to the de facto
custodian.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, if either
parent dies and at the time of death a child is in the custody of a de facto custodian,
as defined in KRS 403.270, the court shall award custody to the de facto custodian
if the court determines that the best interests of the child will be served by that
award of custody.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/5/2025 9:08 AM Jacketed